Massachusetts, session 194th, H4028.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) The general court hereby finds that: 
(i) Prior to 1991, the department of correction operated under the governance of the 
executive office of health and human services with a focus on rehabilitating vulnerable residents. 
The department's focus included addressing substance use disorder, mental illness, and system-
involved youth. 
(ii) Legislative reports have identified structural issues within correctional 
institutions, with significant percentages of incarcerated individuals lacking adequate treatment. 
Constitutional violations in mental health care have been reported throughout department of 
correction facilities, leading to agreements that remain unmet. 

of 3 10  (iii) The department of correction's annual budget allocates approximately 70 per cent 
for labor costs while only 2 per cent is spent on programming for incarcerated individuals. 
Following the 1991 executive order transferring the department of correction to the executive 
office of public safety and security, health conditions and treatment quality have been 
significantly affected. 
(iv) The executive office of health and human services serves approximately 1 in 3 
residents of the commonwealth with a focus on healthcare, treatment, and support services. The 
executive office of public safety and security focuses primarily on policy development and 
budgetary oversight rather than rehabilitative services. 
(b) There shall be a special commission to study the feasibility and advisability of 
transferring the department of correction and the parole board from the executive office of public 
safety and security to the executive office of health and human services. The commission shall 
investigate: (i) the historical organization and governance of the department of correction and 
parole board; (ii) the legal implications of transferring supervision of the department of 
correction and parole board; (iii) the potential impacts on services, programming, healthcare, 
rehabilitative efforts, and recidivism rates; (iv) the fiscal implications of such transfer; (v) 
practices of other states regarding similar governance structures; and (vi) any other matters the 
commission deems relevant to its investigation and study. 
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of: 3 members of the senate, 1 of whom shall 
be the senate chair of the joint committee on public safety and homeland security who shall serve 
as co-chair, 1 of whom shall be the senate chair of the joint committee on mental health, 
substance use and recovery, and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 

of 3 32 senate; 3 members of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be the house chair of the 
joint committee on public safety and homeland security who shall serve as co-chair, 1 of whom 
shall be the house chair of the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, and 
1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader of the house; the secretary of public safety 
and security or a designee; the secretary of health and human services or a designee; the 
commissioner of correction or a designee; the chair of the parole board or a designee; and 7 
persons to be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a prisoners' 
rights organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a correctional officers' union, 1 of 
whom shall be a representative of a mental health advocacy organization, 1 of whom shall be a 
formerly incarcerated individual, 1 of whom shall be an expert in criminal justice reform, 1 of 
whom shall be an expert in correctional healthcare, and 1 of whom shall be a representative of a 
legal services organization. 
SECTION 3. The commission shall hold at least 4 public hearings in geographically 
diverse regions of the commonwealth. The commission may request from all state agencies such 
information as the commission may require in the course of its investigation and study. 
SECTION 4. The commission shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations, 
together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, by filing 
the same with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than December 31, 
2026. The commission may issue interim reports as it deems appropriate.